Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201444-1311
External review decision; how treated;
limitation on subsequent request.

(1) An external review decision is binding on the health
carrier except to the extent the health carrier has other remedies available
under applicable state law.

(2) An external review
decision is binding on the covered person except to the extent the covered
person has other remedies available under applicable federal or state law.

(3) A covered person
or the covered person's authorized representative, if applicable, shall not
file a subsequent request for external review involving the same adverse determination
or final adverse determination for which the covered person has already received
an external review decision pursuant to the Health Carrier External Review
Act.

Laws 2013, LB147, § 11.